Utah statutes.
77-16a-104.   Verdict of guilty and mentally ill -- Hearing to determine
present mental state.
(1)  Upon a verdict of guilty and mentally ill for the offense charged, or any
lesser offense, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine the defendant's
present mental state.
(2)  The court may order the department to examine the defendant to determine
his mental condition, and may receive the evidence of any public or private
expert witness offered by the defendant or the prosecutor.  The defendant may
be placed in the Utah State Hospital for that examination only upon approval
of the executive director.
(3)  If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant is
currently mentally ill, it shall impose any sentence that could be imposed
under law upon a defendant who is not mentally ill and who is convicted of the
same offense, and:
(a)  commit him to the department, in accordance with the provisions of
Section 77-16a-202, if:
(i)  the court gives the department the opportunity to provide an evaluation
and recommendation under Subsection (4); and
(ii)  the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:
(A)  because of his mental illness the defendant poses an immediate physical
danger to self or others, including jeopardizing his own or others' safety,
health, or welfare if placed in a correctional or probation setting, or lacks
the ability to provide the basic necessities of life, such as food, clothing,
and shelter, if placed on probation; and
(B)  the department is able to provide the defendant with treatment, care,
custody, and security that is adequate and appropriate to the defendant's
conditions and needs;
(b)  order probation in accordance with Section 77-16a-201; or
(c)  if the court determines that commitment to the department under
Subsection (3)(a) or probation under Subsection (3)(b) is not appropriate, the
court shall place the defendant in the custody of UDC or a county jail as
allowed by law.
(4)  In order to insure that the requirements of Subsection (3)(a) are met,
the court shall, prior to making a determination, notify the executive
director of the proposed placement and provide the department with an
opportunity to evaluate the defendant and make a recommendation to the court
regarding placement prior to commitment.
(5)  If the court finds that the defendant is not currently mentally ill, it
shall sentence the defendant as it would any other defendant.
(6)  Expenses for examinations ordered under this section shall be paid in
accordance with Subsection 77-16a-103(5).
